foma/noun/Noun-C1.lexc
LEXICON C1Inflections

+noun+nom: #;
+noun+nom+sandhip:^ப் #;
+noun+nom+sandhic:^ச் #;
+noun+nom+sandhit:^த் #;
+noun+nom+sandhik:^க் #;

+noun+pl+nom:^க்கள் #;

+noun+acc:^வை #;
+noun+pl+acc:^க்களினை #;

+noun+inst:^வால் #;
+noun+pl+inst:^க்களினால் #;

+noun+dat:^வுக்கு #;
+noun+dat+sandhip:^வுக்குப் #;
+noun+dat+sandhic:^வுக்குச் #;
+noun+dat+sandhit:^வுக்குத் #;
+noun+dat+sandhik:^வுக்குக் #;
+noun+dat+pl:^ளுக்கு #;
+noun+dat+pl+sandhip:^ளுக்குப் #;
+noun+dat+pl+sandhic:^ளுக்குச் #;
+noun+dat+pl+sandhit:^ளுக்குத் #;
+noun+dat+pl+sandhik:^ளுக்குக் #;

+noun+soc:^வோடு #;
+noun+pl+soc:^க்களோடு #;
+noun+soc:^வுடன் #;
+noun+pl+soc:^க்களுடன் #;

+noun+abl:^வில் #;
+noun+pl+abl:^க்களில் #;
+noun+abl:^வின் #;
+noun+pl+abl:^க்களின் #;
+noun+abl:^விலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+abl:^க்களிலிருந்து #;

+noun+gen:^வது #;
+noun+pl+gen:^க்களது #;
+noun+gen:^வின் #;
+noun+pl+gen:^க்களின் #;

+noun+loc:^வில் #;
+noun+pl+loc:^க்களில் #;
+noun+loc:^விடம் #;
+noun+pl+loc:^க்களிடம் #;

+noun+foc:^தான் #;
+noun+pl+foc:^க்கள்தான் #;

+noun+psp_varaikkum:^வரைக்கும் #;
+noun+pl+psp_varaikkum:^க்கள்வரைக்கும் #;
+noun+psp_varaiyil:^வரையில் #;
+noun+pl+psp_varaiyil:^க்கள்வரையில் #;
+noun+psp_illaamal:^வில்லாமல் #;
+noun+pl+psp_illaamal:^க்களில்லாமல் #;
+noun+psp_allaamal:^வில்லாமல் #;
+noun+pl+psp_allaamal:^க்களில்லாமல் #;
+noun+psp_tavira:தவிர^ #;
+noun+pl+psp_tavira:^க்கள்தவிர #;
+noun+acc+psp_tavira:^வைத்தவிர #;
+noun+pl+acc+psp_tavira:^க்களைத்தவிர #;
+noun+psp_pola:^போல #;
+noun+pl+psp_pola:^க்கள்போல #;
+noun+acc+psp_pola:^வைப்போல #;
+noun+pl+acc+psp_pola:^க்களைப்போல #;
+noun+psp_pol:^போல் #;
+noun+pl+psp_pol:^க்கள்போல் #;
+noun+acc+psp_pol:^வைப்போல் #;
+noun+pl+acc+psp_pol:^க்களைப்போல் #;
+noun+psp_mathiri:^மாதிரி #;
+noun+pl+psp_mathiri:^க்கள்மாதிரி #;
+noun+acc+psp_mathiri:^வைமாதிரி #;
+noun+pl+acc+psp_mathiri:^க்கள்மாதிரி #;
+noun+psp_aattam:^வாட்டம் #;
+noun+pl+psp_aattam:^க்களாட்டம் #;
+noun+psp_valiyaaka:^வழியாக #;
+noun+pl+psp_valiyaaka:^க்கள்வழியாக #;

+noun+acc+vpart_patti:^வைப்பற்றி #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_patti:^க்களைப்பற்றி #;
+noun+acc+vpart_parttu:^வைப்பற்று  #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_parttu:^க்களைப்பற்று #;
+noun+acc+vpart_nookki:^வைநோக்கி #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_nookki:^க்களைநோக்கி #;
+noun+acc+vpart_cutti:^வைச்சுற்றி #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_cutti:^க்களைச்சுற்றி #;
+noun+acc+vpartp_taandi:^வைத்தாண்டி #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_taandi:^க்களைத்தாண்டி #;
+noun+acc+vpart_tavirtu:^வைத்தவிர்த்து #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_tavirtu:^க்களைத்தவிர்த்து #;
+noun+acc+vpart_otti:^வையொட்டி #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_otti:^க்களையொட்டி #;
+noun+acc+vpart_kondu:^வைக்கொண்டு #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_kondu:^க்களைக்கொண்டு #;
+noun+acc+vpart_vaittu:^வைவைத்து #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_vaittu:^க்களைவைத்து #;
+noun+acc+vpart_vida:^வைவிட #;
+noun+pl+acc+vpart_vida:^க்களைவிட #;

+noun+dat+ben:^வுக்காக #;
+noun+pl+dat+ben:^க்களுக்காக #;
+noun+dat+n_pathil+adv:^வுக்குப்பதிலாக #;
+noun+pl+dat+n_pathil+adv:^க்களுக்குப்பதிலாக #;
+noun+dat+psp_piraku:^வுக்குப்பிறகு #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_piraku:^க்களுக்குப்பிறகு #;
+noun+dat+psp_appuram:^வுக்கப்புறம் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_appuram:^க்களுக்கப்புறம் #;
+noun+dat+psp_appaal:^வுக்கப்பால் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_appaal:^க்களுக்கப்பால் #;
+noun+dat+psp_appaal_iruntu:^வுக்கப்பாலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_appaal_iruntu:^க்களுக்கப்பாலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_meel:^வுக்குமேல் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_meel:^க்களுக்குமேல் #;
+noun+dat+psp_meel_iruntu:^வுக்குமேலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_meel_iruntu:^க்களுக்குமேலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_keel:^வுக்குக்கீழ் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_keel:^க்களுக்குக்கீழ் #;
+noun+dat+psp_keel_iruntu:^வுக்குக்கீழிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_keel_iruntu:^க்களுக்குக்கீழிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_keele:^வுக்குக்கீழே #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_keele:^க்களுக்குக்கீழே #;
+noun+dat+psp_keele_iruntu:^வுக்குக்கீழேயிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_keele_iruntu:^க்களுக்குகீழேயிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_ul:^வுக்குள் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ul:^க்களுக்குள் #;
+noun+dat+psp_ul_iruntu:^வுக்குள்ளிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ul_iruntu:^க்களுக்குள்ளிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_ule:^வுக்குள்ளே #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ule:^க்களுக்குள்ளே #;
+noun+dat+psp_ule_iruntu:^வுக்குள்ளேயிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ule_iruntu:^க்களுக்குள்ளேயிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_veliyee:^வுக்குவெளியே #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_veliyee:^க்களுக்குவெளியே #;
+noun+dat+psp_veliyee_iruntu:^வுக்குவெளியேயிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_veliyee_iruntu:^க்களுக்குவெளியேயிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_veliyil:^வுக்குவெளியில் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_veliyil:^க்களுக்குவெளியில் #;
+noun+dat+psp_veliyil_iruntu:^வுக்குவெளியிலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_veliyil_iruntu:^க்களுக்குவெளியிலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_atiyil:^வுக்கடியில் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_atiyil:^க்களுக்கடியில் #;
+noun+dat+psp_atiyil_iruntu:^வுக்கடியிலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_atiyil_iruntu:^க்களுக்கடியிலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_arukil:^வுக்கருகில் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_arukil:^க்களுக்கருகில் #;
+noun+dat+psp_atiyil_iruntu:^வுக்கருகிலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_atiyil_iruntu:^க்களுக்கருகிலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_mun:^வுக்குமுன் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_mun:^க்களுக்குமுன் #;
+noun+dat+psp_mun_iruntu:^வுக்குமுன்னிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_mun_iruntu:^க்களுக்குமுன்னிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_munnaal:^வுக்குமுன்னால் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_munnaal:^க்களுக்குமுன்னால் #;
+noun+dat+psp_munnaal_iruntu:^வுக்குமுன்னாலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_munnaal_iruntu:^க்களுக்குமுன்னாலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_munne:^வுக்குமுன்னே #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_munne:^க்களுக்குமுன்னே #;
+noun+dat+psp_pin:^வுக்குபின் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_pin:^க்களுக்குப்பின் #;
+noun+dat+psp_pin_iruntu:^வுக்குபின்னிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_pin_iruntu:^க்களுக்குப்பின்னிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_pinnaal:^வுக்குப்பின்னால் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_pinnaal:^க்களுக்குப்பின்னால் #;
+noun+dat+psp_pinnaal_iruntu:^வுக்குப்பின்னாலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_pinnaal_iruntu:^க்களுக்குப்பின்னாலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_pinne:^வுக்குப்பின்னே #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_pinne:^க்களுக்குப்பின்னே #;
+noun+dat+psp_pinne_iruntu:^வுக்குப்பின்னேயிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_pinne_iruntu:^க்களுக்குப்பின்னேயிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_kurukke:^வுக்குக்குறுக்கே #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_kurukke:^க்களுக்குக்குறுக்கே #;
+noun+dat+psp_kurukke_iruntu:^வுக்குக்குறுக்கேயிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_kurukke_iruntu:^க்களுக்குக்குறுக்கேயிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_ul:^வுக்குள் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ul:^க்களுக்குள் #;
+noun+dat+psp_ul_iruntu:^வுக்குள்ளிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ul_iruntu:^க்களுக்குள்ளிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_ulle:^வுக்குள்ளே #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ulle:^க்களுக்குள்ளே #;
+noun+dat+psp_ulle_iruntu:^வுக்குள்ளேயிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ulle_iruntu:^க்களுக்குள்ளேயிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_ethire:^வுக்கெதிரே #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ethire:^க்களுக்கெதிரே #;
+noun+dat+psp_ethire_iruntu:^வுக்கெதிரிலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ethire_iruntu:^க்களுக்கெதிரிலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_ethir:^வுக்கெதிர் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ethir:^க்களுக்குகெதிர் #;
+noun+dat+psp_ethir_iruntu:^வுக்கெதிரிலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_ethir_iruntu:^க்களுக்கெதிரிலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_idaiyl:^வுக்கிடையில் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_idaiyil:^க்களுக்கிடையில் #;
+noun+dat+psp_idayil_iruntu:^வுக்கிடையிலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_idayil_iruntu:^க்களுக்கிடையிலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+psp_naduvil:^வுக்குநடுவில் #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_naduvil:^க்களுக்குநடுவில் #;
+noun+dat+psp_naduvil_iruntu:^வுக்குநடுவிலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+dat+psp_naduvil_iruntu:^க்களுக்குநடுவிலிருந்து #;
+noun+dat+ben:^வுக்காக #;
+noun+pl+dat+ben:^க்களுக்காக #;

+noun+gen+psp_arukil:^வினருகில் #;
+noun+pl+gen+psp_arukil:^க்களினருகில் #;
+noun+gen+psp_arukil_iruntu:^வினருகிலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+gen+psp_arukil_iruntu:^க்களினருகிலிருந்து #;
+noun+gen+psp_meel:^வின்மேல் #;
+noun+pl+gen+psp_meel:^க்களின்மேல் #;
+noun+gen+psp_meel_iruntu:^வின்மேலிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+gen+psp_meel_iruntu:^க்களின்மேலிருந்து #;
+noun+gen+psp_meele:^வின்மேலே #;
+noun+pl+gen+psp_meele:^க்களின்மேலே #;
+noun+gen+psp_meele_iruntu:^வின்மேலேயிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+gen+psp_meele_iruntu:^க்களின்மேலேயிருந்து #;
+noun+gen+psp_keel:^வின்கீழ் #;
+noun+pl+gen+psp_keel:^க்களின்கீழ் #;
+noun+gen+psp_keel_iruntu:^வின்கீழிருந்து #;
